Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Chapter 6

Distribution of Publications

12-6-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Non-depository publication” means printed and electronic publications not collected by state depository libraries, including, but not limited to:

Ephemeral materials, such as business cards, stationery, invitations, postcards, and flyers;

Publications created for state agency internal use, such as handbooks, manuals, conference items of temporary use, instructional items, and agendas;

Agency materials not distributed outside of the creating agency, such as working papers, internal newsletters, internal memoranda, and confidential material; and

Reprints of federal materials;

“Publication” includes any newsletter, stationery, greeting card, report, or printed or electronic material produced in any format for distribution outside the creating department or agency, including those published by facilities not operated by the state; and

“State depository publication” includes:

The acts and journals of the general assembly, the reports of the supreme court, and such other courts that have their decisions reported by the attorney general and reporter, or that are required to be reported by any act or resolution of the general assembly;

The regularly published reports of officers of this state and any special reports that may from time to time be published by state officers or committees of the general assembly or other committees provided for by law, including, but not limited to:

Public and private acts;

Court reports and opinions;

Rules and regulations;

Budget, revenue, and tax report documents;

Annual and biennial reports;

Vital statistics, court statistics, and census reports;

Periodic and special reports;

State plans and strategic plans;

Tennessee Blue Book;

Fact books;

Maps;

Magazines;

External newsletters (those available for public information); and

Such other reports or statements published under the authority of the state, or any official thereof; and

“State depository publication” does not include non-depository publications.

Code 1858, § 22 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 2, § 9); Shan., § 40; Acts 1923, ch. 101, § 2; Code 1932, § 69; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-601; Acts 1981, ch. 191, § 1; 1984, ch. 798, § 2; 2019, ch. 8, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “Each member of the general assembly is entitled to one (1) copy of the printed acts of the general assembly of which such person was a member, which shall be delivered to such member's legislative office in Nashville, but only upon written request to the secretary of state by such member not later than February 1 of each year.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 8, § 9. March 13, 2019.

Cross-References. English deemed official and legal language, §4-1-404.

12-6-102. General distribution of acts.

It is the duty of the secretary of state to distribute the printed acts, upon written request received not later than February 1 of each year, as follows: to each executive officer and Tennessee public utility commission commissioner of the state, one (1) copy; to each judge and each clerk of the supreme, appeals, circuit, criminal and general sessions courts, one (1) copy; to each chancellor, each clerk and master, one (1) copy; to each district attorney general and each assistant, one (1) copy; to the attorney general and reporter and each assistant, one (1) copy; to each clerk of the probate courts and each judge of the county or probate courts, and to each register and each trustee, and each assessor of property, one (1) copy; each of the copies to belong to the indicated office, and go to the successor of the incumbent; also to the order of the University of Tennessee, up to thirty (30) copies for the use of the University of Tennessee as a depository and for exchanges.

A copy of the printed acts shall be, upon written request received not later than February 1 of each year, delivered to every organized bar association in this state; provided, that such bar association maintains a law library; and provided the name and address of such bar association shall be certified to the secretary of state by the county clerk of the county in which the association exists; and provided further, that should the association cease to function or to maintain a law library, all copies of the acts shall thereupon be turned over and delivered to the county clerk.

Bound volumes of acts or resolutions may be made available to any person, firm or corporation, requesting same in writing not later than February 1 of each year, at a price to be fixed by the secretary of state not to exceed per volume printing cost.

Any requests for acts or resolutions received later than February 1 of each year will be accepted subject to availability.

This section and §§ 12-6-101 and 12-6-103 shall not apply to the Tennessee Code Annotated, any supplement thereto or replacement volume thereof, or any act enacting that code.

Code 1858, § 30; Shan., § 42; Acts 1923, ch. 101, § 2; mod. Code 1932, § 70; Acts 1935, ch. 181, § 2; 1941, ch. 22, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 70; modified; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1961, ch. 290, § 1; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-602; Acts 1981, ch. 191, §§ 2-5; 1988, ch. 745, § 1; 1991, ch. 98, § 1; 1994, ch. 622, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 98; 2017, ch. 94, § 32.

Cross-References. Printing and distribution of school laws, §49-1-201.

Tennessee Code Annotated, §§1-1-105 —1-1-113.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

12-6-103. Publication of acts and journals.

The secretary of state shall also make available additional copies of the acts by publishing the acts in electronic format on the department of state's website. Each house shall make available copies of their journals by publishing the journals in electronic format on their respective websites.

Code 1858, § 31; Shan., § 43; mod. Code 1932, § 71; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-603; Acts 2015, ch. 305, § 1.

12-6-104. Shipment of acts.

The secretary of state shall cause the acts for the several officers whose offices are not at the capitol to be safely packed and boxed, and to be shipped prepaid in the way most feasible.

Code 1858, § 32; Acts 1873, ch. 63; Shan., §§ 44-46; Acts 1923, ch. 101, § 4; mod. Code 1932, §§ 72-74; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-604; Acts 1981, ch. 191, § 6.

12-6-105. Penalty for failure to distribute acts.

If the printer or secretary of state fails to perform such printer's or secretary of state's duties, the printer or secretary of state shall forfeit five hundred dollars ($500), to be recovered in the name and for the use of the state by the comptroller of the treasury.

Moreover, such failure is a Class C misdemeanor, and the comptroller of the treasury shall cause the delinquent to be indicted for the same.

The comptroller of the treasury shall forfeit the sum of five hundred dollars ($500), to be recovered by any person who will sue for the same, if the comptroller of the treasury fails to enforce the aforementioned penalties against the printer and secretary of state.

Code 1858, §§ 26-28; Shan., §§ 47-49; Code 1932, §§ 75-77; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-605; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

12-6-106. All other public documents.

All other public documents, required to be distributed by law, may be distributed with the acts and journals.

Code 1858, § 37; Shan., § 54; Code 1932, § 78; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-606; Acts 1984, ch. 798, § 7; 2017, ch. 111, § 1.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

12-6-107. Libraries as depositories for state documents and state depository publications — Copies — Legislative reference and law library.

The state library and archives at Nashville, the John C. Hodges Library of the University of Tennessee, at Knoxville, the Benjamin L. Hooks Central Library at Memphis, the Ned R. McWherter Library at the University of Memphis, the Sherrod Library at East Tennessee State University, and such other libraries as the governor may at any time name by executive order are designated depositories for state documents and for all state depository publications issued by any official of the state.

Upon request of a designated depository of state depository publications, such depository is entitled to receive, without charge, one (1) copy of the bills, resolutions, amendments, daily journals, informational services showing committee actions and the status of pieces of legislation, daily calendars, published committee reports, and any official or unofficial published index.

To ensure access of all state depository publications to members of the general assembly without the expense of furnishing copies for each member, all state documents and state depository publications otherwise distributed to depository libraries must be distributed to the legislative reference and law library for the use of the general assembly.

Acts 1917, ch. 42, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1387a7; Code 1932, § 2283; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-607; Acts 1981, ch. 191, § 7; 1984, ch. 798, § 3; 1984, ch. 903, § 1; 2019, ch. 8, § 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), inserted “and archives”, substituted “John C. Hodges Library of the University of Tennessee, at Knoxville, the Benjamin L. Hooks Central Library at Memphis, the Ned R. McWherter Library at the University of Memphis, the Sherrod Library at East Tennessee State University,” for “library of the University of Tennessee at Knoxville, the Cossitt Library at Memphis”, and inserted “state depository”, in (b), substituted “depository publications” for “document” and substituted “is entitled” for “shall be entitled”; in (c), inserted “depository” following “access of all state”, inserted “state depository” following “all state documents and”, and substituted “libraries must be distributed to the legislative reference and law library” for “libraries shall also be distributed to the legislative library”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 8, § 9. March 13, 2019.

12-6-108. Printed copy of acts for members of the general assembly — Written request requirements.

Each member of the general assembly is entitled to one (1) copy of the printed acts of the general assembly of which the person was a member, which must be delivered to the member's legislative office in Nashville, but only upon written request to the secretary of state by the member not later than February 1 of each year.

Acts 1917, ch. 42, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1387a11; Code 1932, § 2287; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-608; 2019, ch. 8, § 3.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “The publications and documents referred to shall include: (1) The acts and journals of the general assembly, the reports of the supreme court, and such other courts as shall have their decisions reported by the attorney general and reporter, or shall be required by any act or resolution of the general assembly; (2) The periodical reports of officers of the state and any special reports that may from time to time be made by state officers or committees of the general assembly or other committees provided for by law; and (3) Such other reports or statements as may be published under the authority of the state, or any official thereof.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 8, § 9. March 13, 2019.

12-6-109. Notice of publications — Access to state electronic publications.

At least quarterly, a list of all publications must be provided by the department of general services to the Tennessee state library and archives and other state depository libraries. Notice of publication and access to state electronic publications must be provided to all state depository libraries.

Acts 1917, ch. 42, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1387a10; Code 1932, § 2286; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-609; Acts 1981, ch. 191, § 8; 2019, ch. 8, § 4.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “The person or persons in charge of the making of such documents and publications as are at any time issued by the state, or by any official or officials of the state, shall furnish a list of such documents and publications to the secretary of state.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 8, § 9. March 13, 2019.

12-6-110. Copies to depositories, legislative reference and law library, secretary of state, and commissioner of general services.

At the expense of each department, agency, board, or commission, the person in charge of making documents and publications shall distribute or have distributed:

One (1) copy of all state depository publications to the librarian, person, or persons in charge of each of the depositories and the legislative reference and law library;

Upon request, two (2) copies of all state depository publications to the secretary of state; and

Upon request, two (2) copies of all state depository publications to the commissioner of general services.

Acts 1917, ch. 42, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1387a8; mod. Code 1932, § 2284; C. Supp. 1950, § 2284; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-610; Acts 1981, ch. 191, § 9; 1981, ch. 81, § 1; 2019, ch. 8, § 5.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in the introductory language, substituted “each” for “such”, deleted “such” preceding “documents”, substituted “distribute or have distributed” for “furnish or have furnished”; rewrote (1), which read: “Two (2) copies directly to the librarian or person in charge of each of the depositories;”; inserted “of all state depository publications” in (2); and rewrote (3), which read: “Two (2) copies to any location or locations specified by the proper governing publications committee created pursuant to chapter 7, part 1 of this title.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch 8, § 9. March 13, 2019.

12-6-111. Exchange copies for university.

Upon request by the University of Tennessee, the person in charge of the making of such publications or the issuance of such documents shall furnish the university up to thirty (30) copies of each publication or document.

Acts 1935, ch. 181, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 2284; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-611; Acts 1981, ch. 191, § 10.

12-6-112. Care of depository copies.

The librarian or other person in charge of each depository shall receive and carefully preserve all state documents and publications, both printed and electronic, so received.

Acts 1917, ch. 42, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1387a9; Code 1932, § 2285; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-612; Acts 2019, ch. 8, § 6.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in the first sentence, deleted “It is the duty of” from the beginning, substituted “shall receive” for “to give receipt for”, inserted “both printed and electronic”, and deleted the second and third sentences, which read: “One (1) of the two (2) copies shall be lendable on application, to the persons, if any, allowed to take other books from the library of the depository. The other copy shall not be allowed to be taken from the premises of the depository.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 8, § 9. March 13, 2019.

12-6-113. Exchanges by state librarian.

The state librarian and archivist may, from time to time, procure from the general government, any foreign government, or from any state or territory within the United States, the public acts, and law and equity reports of such government, state or territory, by exchanging the public acts or reports of this state.

Code 1858, § 38 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 135, § 2); impl. am. Priv. Acts 1859-1860, ch. 53, § 2; Acts 1879, ch. 31, §§ 1, 6; Shan., § 55; mod. Code 1932, § 79; impl. am. Acts 1951, ch. 197, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-613.

12-6-114. [Repealed]

Acts 1879, ch. 31, § 8; Shan., § 51; mod. Code 1932, § 80; impl. am. Acts 1951, ch. 197, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-614; Acts 1981, ch. 191, § 11; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 8, § 8, effective March 13, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former §12-6-114, concerned delivery of exchange copies.

12-6-115. Rules regarding state depository publications in electronic format.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules to effectuate the preservation, distribution, accessibility, and availability of state depository publications in electronic format. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2019, ch. 8, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former §12-6-115 (Code 1858, § 39 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 135, § 1); Shan., § 56; mod. Code 1932, § 81; C. Supp. 1950, § 81; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-615), concerning expense of exchanges, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 191, § 13. For present law, see §8-1-106.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 8, § 9. March 13, 2019.

12-6-116. Copies of acts — Acts on the internet.

The secretary of state is authorized to furnish to any person, firm, or corporation, so requesting in writing, copies of the public acts of the general assembly which are prepared at intervals during and after each legislative session and made available online pending publication of the bound volumes of the public acts of Tennessee, for that session. Notwithstanding any other law, the secretary of state is authorized to fulfill this chapter and §8-3-104 by publishing the text of the public acts in electronic form by use of the internet.

Acts 1970, ch. 460, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-616; Acts 1981, ch. 191, § 12; 1990, ch. 1024, § 14; 1994, ch. 622, § 2; 1999, ch. 150, § 2; 2017, ch. 111, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Electronic general assembly journals, §12-6-119.

Report of local action included in published volume, §8-3-204.

Attorney General Opinions. The secretary of state fulfills his duty to publish the acts of the general assembly by publishing them in electronic form via the internet, OAG 07-018, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 18 (2/16/07).

12-6-117. Certain resolutions not to be printed or distributed — Distribution to state library and archives and legislative reference and law library.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, resolutions of the general assembly that honor or commend individuals or groups or that express sympathy or condolences upon the death of an individual shall not be printed in the Acts of Tennessee, nor shall such resolutions be distributed in accordance with this chapter, unless the secretary of state, in consultation with the speaker of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives, determines that the resolution requires printing due to the prominence of or contributions made by such person or group. The secretary of state shall publish all resolutions in electronic form by use of the internet.

The secretary of state shall deliver one (1) copy of all resolutions that are not printed pursuant to this section to the state library and archives and to the legislative reference and law library.

Acts 1981, ch. 109, § 3; 2017, ch. 111, §§ 4, 5.

12-6-118. Automatic and other distributions.

Except for exchange and depository copies provided for herein, there shall be no automatic distribution of any state report or publication, unless such distribution is required by an act or resolution enacted after May 25, 1984. Any other distribution must be approved by the state publications committee, as provided for in chapter 7, part 1 of this title, or be upon individual request of a person entitled to or desirous of receipt of any such publication or report.

Acts 1984, ch. 798, § 4.

12-6-119. Electronic general assembly journals.

Copies of the journals of the house of representatives and the senate may be distributed to depository libraries in electronic format rather than in bound volumes.

Acts 1999, ch. 150, § 1.

Cross-References. Public Acts on the internet, §12-6-116.